Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 12-1201 to 12-1212 shall be known and may be cited as the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act.

Laws 1989, LB 340, § 1.